Alabama, session 2026rs, HB441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Any municipality within Escambia County
may contract with the Sheriff of Escambia County for police
services. The contract may include enforcement by the sheriff,
or his or her duly commissioned deputies, of all laws within
the corporate limits and police jurisdiction of the
municipality, including municipal ordinances, and the arrest
or citation of any offenders as if the sheriff, or his or her
duly commissioned deputies, were duly constituted police
officers of the municipality.
(b) A municipality entering into a contract pursuant to
subsection (a) shall pay to the county treasury a sum
sufficient to provide the necessary manpower and equipment as
mutually agreed upon by the municipal governing body, the
sheriff, and the county commission.
(c) The county commission shall receive from the
municipality the funds paid under the contract for police
services and may expend funds for police services in the
municipality, including the police jurisdiction of the
Page 1

municipality, including the police jurisdiction of the
HB441 Enrolled
municipality.
(d) Each contract between the sheriff and a
municipality must have the consent and approval of the sheriff
and the county commission.
(e) The sheriff and his or her duly commissioned
deputies, in the performance of any duties carried out
pursuant to a contract with a municipality, shall retain the
legal and constitutional immunity afforded to each of them by
law.
(f)(1) The Escambia County Commission may by resolution
of the commission provide a supplemental salary to the sheriff
for the performance of additional duties relating to the
contracting of police services for a municipality. The
performance of additional duties relating to the contracting
of police services for a municipality by the sheriff shall be
pursuant to an agreement between the sheriff and the county
commission subject to approval of the county commission.
(2) The supplemental salary shall be paid by the county
for the performance of additional duties by the sheriff and
shall not be considered a part of the regular salary of the
sheriff. In the event the county commission or sheriff
withdraws from the agreement, the supplemental salary shall be
discontinued. The supplemental salary provided by this
subsection shall not affect or increase the compensation of
any supernumerary sheriff in the county.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 2

2026.
HB441 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 19-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 25-Feb-26 Passed



Page 3